Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.100

Limitation of legal aid.

No legal aid shall be rendered by or through any bureau as to any matter which, in the opinion of the director or the committee is not a proper subject of legal aid. No legal aid shall be given concerning matters relating to claims or litigation commonly handled on a contingent fee basis, nor to the defense of criminal charges in court.

[ 1939 c 93 s 10; RRS s 10007-210. Formerly RCW 74.36.100.]